Idaho, session 2026, H0911.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 3, Title 61, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 61-335, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
61-335. NEW LARGE LOAD AND RATEPAYER PROTECTION. (1) For the purposes
of this section:
(a) "Electric service" means electricity furnished to an ultimate con-
sumer by a public utility.
(b) "Increase in a cumulative power requirement" means the maximum
contracted demand, expressed in megawatts, measured relative to the
highest contracted demand of such service entrance in the previous
sixty (60) month period.
(c) "New large load" means any electrical load associated with a new
service entrance, any additional electric service associated with a
change, enlargement, or other modification of a service entrance, or
the utilization of an existing service entrance that:
(i) Results in an increase in a cumulative power requirement of
such service entrance of fifty (50) megawatts or more in any con-
secutive sixty (60) month period; and
(ii) Is subject to a service contract with a public utility that
was entered into on or after July 1, 2026.
(d) "No harm test" means an assessment by the public utilities commis-
sion to determine the impact a new large load will have on the rates of
existing utility customers.
(e) The following terms shall have the same meaning as provided for in
section 61-332A, Idaho Code:
(i) "Commission";
(ii) "Consumer";
(iii) "New service entrance";
(iv) "Public utility"; and
(v) "Service entrance."
(2) A public utility shall provide service to a new large load only pur-
suant to a commission-approved service contract.
(3) A public utility shall file the service contract with the commis-
sion for approval prior to providing service to a new large load. Such filing
shall include a no harm test and other supporting information sufficient to
demonstrate compliance with the requirements of this section.


(4) The commission shall review and approve or deny a new large load
service contract within two hundred seventy (270) days of receiving such
filing by the public utility. The commission shall approve the service con-
tract if the public utility demonstrates that:
(a) It is reasonably expected to maintain the same or higher level of
service quality and reliability available to the public utility's other
customers as would have been reasonably expected to exist had the public
utility not served the new large load; and
(b) The new large load is responsible for funding its full cost of ser-
vice, including its share of generation, transmission, substation, and
distribution infrastructure investments that would not be placed in
service or be required by the public utility but for the new large load.
Such investments may be directly assigned or allocated in part as may be
determined by the commission pursuant to this section.
(5) A new large load shall not change its status as such by means of ar-
tifice, such as by splitting its load among more than one (1) electric ser-
vice entrance or by adding additional connections, meters, or new service
entrances to serve an otherwise single entity or enterprise.
(6) Approval of a service contract shall be conditioned on the new large
load furnishing financial security, in a form and amount approved by the com-
mission, that is reasonably sufficient to protect the public utility and its
other customers from the risk of stranded costs, unrecoverable costs, or un-
recoverable investments incurred by the public utility in reliance on the
new large load's contracted power requirement.
(7)(a) In each general rate case filed by a public utility, the commis-
sion shall review the rates, charges, and cost recovery mechanisms ap-
plicable to an approved service contract as part of a comprehensive pub-
lic utility cost study to ensure the new large load is assigned its full
cost of service.
(b) The commission may, if necessary, prospectively adjust the appli-
cable rates, charges, and cost recovery mechanisms pursuant to this
section.
(8)(a) The commission shall issue orders setting forth guidance or
other requirements necessary to implement the provisions of this sec-
tion and to provide reasonable assurance that new large loads will not
cause the rates charged to the public utility's other customers to in-
crease.
(b) The commission shall have the jurisdiction to resolve all disputes
arising under this section.
(9) Providing electric service pursuant to this section shall not be
construed to:
(a) Be a grant of preference or advantage;
(b) Subject any person or corporation to any prejudice or disadvantage;
or
(c) Establish or maintain any unreasonable difference in rates,
charges, or services in any respect.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.